Missouri, session 2026, SB1253.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 575.353, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 575.353,
to read as follows:
575.353. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "Max's Law".
2. A person commits the offense of assault on a law
enforcement animal if he or she knowingly attempts to kill
or disable or knowingly causes or attempts to cause serious
physical injury to a law enforcement animal when that animal
is involved in law enforcement investigation, apprehension,
tracking, or search, or the animal is in the custody of or
under the control of a law enforcement officer, department
of corrections officer, municipal police department, fire
department or a rescue unit or agency.
3. The offense of assault on a law enforcement animal
is a:
(1) Class [A misdemeanor] E felony, if the law
enforcement animal is not injured to the point of requiring
veterinary care or treatment;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1253 2
(2) Class [E] D felony if the law enforcement animal
is seriously injured to the point of requiring veterinary
care or treatment; and
(3) Class [D] C felony if the assault results in the
death of such animal.
✓